Illinois, session 104th, HB4097.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Public Higher Education Act is amended by 5adding Section 11 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 167/11 new)7    Sec. 11. Educational benefits; noncitizens. 8Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a 9resident of the State who is not lawfully present in the United 10States is not eligible, on the basis of residence within the 11State, for any postsecondary educational benefit from a public 12institution of higher education unless a citizen or national 13of the United States is eligible for such a benefit without 14regard to whether the citizen or national is such a resident. 15Any benefit conferred to a nonresident of the State who is 16lawfully present in the United States may not be lesser in 17amount, duration, or scope than the benefit conferred to a 18State resident who is unlawfully present in the United States. 19    Section 10. The Board of Higher Education Act is amended 20by adding Section 9.45 as follows: 21    (110 ILCS 205/9.45 new)  HB4097- 2 -LRB104 14502 LNS 27642 b1    Sec. 9.45. Educational benefits; noncitizens. 2Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a 3resident of the State who is not lawfully present in the United 4States is not eligible, on the basis of residence within the 5State, for any postsecondary educational benefit from the 6Board unless a citizen or national of the United States is 7eligible for such a benefit without regard to whether the 8citizen or national is such a resident. Any benefit conferred 9to a nonresident of the State who is lawfully present in the 10United States may not be lesser in amount, duration, or scope 11than the benefit conferred to a State resident who is 12unlawfully present in the United States.  13    Section 15. The Higher Education Student Assistance Act is 14amended by adding Section 71 as follows: 15    (110 ILCS 947/71 new)16    Sec. 71. Educational benefits; noncitizens. 17Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a 18resident of the State who is not lawfully present in the United 19States is not eligible, on the basis of residence within the 20State, for any postsecondary educational benefit from the 21Commission unless a citizen or national of the United States 22is eligible for such a benefit without regard to whether the 23citizen or national is such a resident. Any benefit conferred 24to a nonresident of the State who is lawfully present in the   HB4097- 3 -LRB104 14502 LNS 27642 b1United States may not be lesser in amount, duration, or scope 2than the benefit conferred to a State resident who is 3unlawfully present in the United States.